California statutes. Business and Professions Code
(3) The extent to which a person will be able to determine, before beginning to train or deploy a foundation model, whether that person will be subject to the
 definition as a
 frontier developer or as a
 large frontier developer with an aim toward allowing earlier determinations if possible.

(4) The complexity of determining whether a person or foundation model is covered, with an aim toward allowing simpler determinations if possible.

(5) The external verifiability of determining whether a person or foundation model is covered, with an aim toward definitions that are verifiable by parties other than the
 frontier developer.

(c) Upon developing recommendations pursuant to this section, the Department of Technology shall submit a report to the Legislature, pursuant to Section 9795 of the Government Code, with those recommendations.

(d) (1) Beginning January 1, 2027, and annually thereafter, the Attorney General shall produce a report with anonymized and aggregated information about reports from covered employees made pursuant to Chapter 5.1 (commencing with Section 1107) of Part 3 of Division 2 of the Labor Code that have been reviewed by the Attorney General since the preceding report.

(2) The Attorney General shall not include information in a report pursuant to this subdivision that would compromise the trade secrets or cybersecurity of a frontier developer, confidentiality of a covered employee, public safety, or the national security of the United States or that
 would be prohibited by any federal or state law.

(3) The Attorney General shall transmit a report pursuant to this subdivision to the Legislature, pursuant to Section 9795 of the Government Code, and to the Governor.

(History: Added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 138, Sec. 2.   (SB 53)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

22757.15.

(a) A large frontier developer that fails to publish or transmit a compliant document required to be published or transmitted under this chapter, makes a statement in violation of subdivision (e) of Section 22757.12, fails to report an incident as required by Section 22757.13, or fails to comply with its own frontier AI framework shall be subject to a civil penalty
 in an amount dependent upon the severity of the violation that does not exceed one million dollars ($1,000,000) per violation.

(b) A civil penalty described in this section shall be recovered in a civil action brought only by the Attorney General.

(History: Added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 138, Sec. 2.   (SB 53)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

22757.16.

The loss of value of equity does not count as damage to or loss of property for the purposes of this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 138, Sec. 2.   (SB 53)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 26. Telephone Equipment [22760. - 22761.]

22760.

(a) It is unlawful to sell within this state any cordless telephone manufactured after January 1, 1992, that does not provide increased protection from unintentional line seizure and dialing, and protection from unintentional ringing.

(b) For the purposes of this section, a cordless telephone is a two-way low power communication system consisting of the following two parts connected by a radio link:

(1) A “base” unit connected to the public switched telephone network.

(2) A “handset” or “remote” unit.

(c) For the purposes of this section, a cordless telephone has increased protection from unintentional line seizure and dialing, and protection from unintentional ringing, if it does either of the following:

(1) Provides a randomly selected preset digital security code from among at least 256 possible codes and a means for the user to manually enter a new security code in the event of interference.

(2) Provides a means for automatically selecting a different code from among at least 256 possible discrete codes.

(d) This section does not apply to any cordless telephone manufactured prior to January 1, 1992, whether, after the operative date of this section, it is inspected, repaired, or refurbished and returned to the original user, provided to another user in exchange for a unit needing repair, or resold.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 340, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

22761.

(a) For purposes of this section, the following terms have the following meanings:

(1) (A) “Smartphone” means a cellular radio telephone or other mobile voice communications handset device that includes all of the following features:

(i) Utilizes a mobile operating system.

(ii) Possesses the capability to utilize mobile software applications, access and browse the Internet, utilize text messaging, utilize digital voice service, and send and receive email.

(iii) Has
 wireless network connectivity.

(iv) Is capable of operating on a long-term evolution network or successor wireless data network communication standards.

(B) A “smartphone” does not include a radio cellular telephone commonly referred to as a “feature” or “messaging” telephone, a laptop, a tablet device, or a device that only has electronic reading capability.

(2) “Essential features” of a smartphone are the ability to use the smartphone for voice communications, text messaging, and the ability to browse the Internet, including the ability to access and use mobile software applications. “Essential features” do not include any functionality needed for the operation of the technological solution, nor does it include the
 ability of the smartphone to access emergency services by a voice call or text to the numerals “911,” the ability of a smartphone to receive wireless emergency alerts and warnings, or the ability to call an emergency number predesignated by the owner.

(3) “Hard reset” means the restoration of a smartphone to the state it was in when it left the
 factory through processes commonly termed a factory reset or master reset.

(4) “Sold in California,” or any variation thereof, means that the smartphone is sold at retail from a location within the state, or the smartphone is sold and shipped to an end-use consumer at an address within the state. “Sold in California” does not include a smartphone that is resold in the state on the secondhand market or that is consigned and held as collateral on a loan.

(b) (1) Except as provided in paragraph (3), any smartphone that is manufactured on or after July 1, 2015, and sold in California
 after that date, shall include a technological solution at the time of sale, to be provided by the manufacturer or operating system provider, that, once initiated and successfully communicated to the smartphone, can render the essential features of the smartphone inoperable to an unauthorized user when the smartphone is not in the possession of an authorized user. The smartphone shall, during the initial device setup process, prompt an authorized user to enable the technological solution. The technological solution shall be reversible, so that if an authorized user obtains possession of the smartphone after the essential features of the smartphone have been rendered inoperable, the operation of those essential features can be restored by an authorized user. A technological solution may consist of software, hardware, or a combination of both software and hardware, and when enabled, shall be able to
 withstand a hard reset or operating system downgrade and shall prevent reactivation of the smartphone on a wireless network except by an authorized user.

(2) An authorized user of a smartphone may affirmatively elect to disable or opt-out of enabling the technological solution at any time. However, the physical acts necessary to disable or opt-out of enabling the technological solution may only be performed by the authorized user or a person specifically selected by the authorized user to disable or opt-out of enabling the technological solution.

(3) Any smartphone model that was first introduced prior to January 1, 2015, that cannot reasonably be reengineered to support the manufacturer’s or operating system provider’s
 technological solution, including if the hardware or software cannot support a retroactive update, is not subject to the requirements of this section.

(c) The knowing retail sale of a smartphone in California in violation of subdivision (b) may be subject to a civil penalty of not less than five hundred dollars ($500), nor more than two thousand five hundred dollars ($2,500), per smartphone sold in California in violation of this section. A suit to enforce this subdivision may only be brought by the Attorney General, a district attorney, or a city attorney. A failure of the technological solution due to hacking or other third-party circumvention may be considered a violation for purposes of this subdivision, only if, at the time of sale, the seller had received notification from the manufacturer or operating
 system provider that the vulnerability cannot be remedied by a software patch or other solution. There is no private right of action to enforce this subdivision.

(d) The retail sale in California of a smartphone shall not result in any civil liability to the seller and its employees and agents from that retail sale alone if the liability results from or is caused by failure of a technological solution required pursuant to this section, including any hacking or other third-party circumvention of the technological solution, unless at the time of sale the seller had received notification from the manufacturer or operating system provider that the vulnerability cannot be remedied by a software patch or other solution. Nothing in this subdivision precludes a suit for civil damages on any other basis outside of the retail sale transaction, including,
 but not limited to, a claim of false advertising.

(e) Any request by a government agency to interrupt communications service utilizing a technological solution required by this section is subject to Section 7908 of the Public Utilities Code.

(f) Nothing in this section prohibits a network operator, device manufacturer, or operating system provider from offering a technological solution or other service in addition to the technological solution required to be provided by the device manufacturer or operating system provider pursuant subdivision (b).

(g) Nothing in this section requires a technological solution that is incompatible with, or renders it impossible to comply with, obligations under state and federal law
 and regulation related to any of the following:

(1) The provision of emergency services through the 911 system, including text to 911, bounce-back messages, and location accuracy requirements.

(2) Participation in the wireless emergency alert system.

(3) Participation in state and local emergency alert and public safety warning systems.

(h) The Legislature finds and declares that the enactment of a uniform policy to deter thefts of smartphones and to protect the privacy of smartphone users if their smartphones are involuntarily acquired by others is a matter of statewide concern and no city, county, or city and
 county shall impose requirements on manufacturers, operating system providers, wireless carriers, or retailers relating to technological solutions for smartphones.

(History: Added by Stats. 2014, Ch. 275, Sec. 2.   (SB 962)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 27. Cable Television [22770. - 22770.]

22770.

(a) “Cable television operator” means the person or entity providing cable television services through the cable television system.

(b) “Video provider” means any person, company, or service which provides one or more channels of video programming to a residence, including a home, condominium, apartment, or mobilehome, where some fee is paid, whether directly or as included in dues or rental charges, for that service, whether or not public rights-of-way are utilized in the delivery of the video programming. A “video provider” shall include, but not be limited to, providers of cable television, master antenna television, satellite master antenna television, direct broadcast satellite, multipoint distribution service, and other providers of video programming, whatever their technology.

(c) No cable television operator or video provider shall charge for a service, for which a separate and distinct charge was made, that is provided to a consumer on an individual basis at no charge unless the customer affirmatively and specifically elects to continue that service for the applicable charge. This election may be made by the consumer at any time prior to the imposition of the applicable charge, including at any time prior to first receiving the service for no charge. This section shall not apply to the addition of any service to a package, tier or service offering or any restructuring or retiering of any package, tier or service offering, provided the consumer is receiving the package, tier or servicing offering at the time of the addition, restructuring or retiering.

(History: Added by Stats. 1992, Ch. 361, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 27.3. Video Streaming Services [22775. - 22777.]

22775.

For purposes of this chapter, the following definitions apply:

(a) “Video programming” has the same meaning as defined in Section 613(h) of Title 47 of the United States Code.

(b) (1) “Video streaming service” means an entity that makes available directly to the consumer, through a distribution method that uses internet protocol, either of the following:

(A) Video programming.

(B) Video content the entity makes
 available for users to view.

(2) “Video streaming service” does not include a television broadcast station, cable operator, or other multichannel video programing distributor, or an entity that serves video programming or video content without commercial advertisements.

(History: Added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 336, Sec. 1.   (SB 576)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

22776.

On and after July 1, 2026, a video streaming service that serves consumers residing in the state shall not transmit the audio of commercial advertisements louder than the video content the advertisements accompany, consistent with the regulations adopted by the Federal Communications Commission pursuant to the Commercial Advertisement Loudness Mitigation (CALM) Act (Public Law 111-311) for television broadcast stations, cable operators, and other multichannel video programming distributors.

(History: Added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 336, Sec. 1.   (SB 576)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

22777.

This chapter does not create a private right of action.

(History: Added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 336, Sec. 1.   (SB 576)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 27.5. Commercial Mail Receiving Agency [22780. - 22780.]

22780.

(a) A commercial mail receiving agency shall not accept a Postal Service Form 1583 until positive identification has been established for the person filing the form. For purposes of this section, positive identification means any one of the following:

(1) Driver’s license.

(2) State identification card.

(3) Armed forces identification card.

(4) Employment identification card which contains the bearer’s signature and photograph.

(5) Any similar documentation which provides the agency with reasonable assurance of the identity of the filer.

(b) A commercial mail receiving agency shall maintain a copy of any Postal Service Form 1583 filed with the United States Postal Service. Upon the request of any law enforcement agency conducting an investigation, the commercial mail receiving agency shall make available to that law enforcement agency for purposes of that investigation and copying, its copy of the Postal Service Form 1583.

(c) A violation of this chapter is an infraction punishable by a fine of not less than one hundred dollars ($100) for the first offense, and a fine of not less than five hundred dollars ($500) for each subsequent offense.

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 636, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 28.  Fair Practices of Equipment Manufacturers, Distributors, Wholesalers, and Dealers Act [22900. - 22927.]

22900.

The Legislature finds and declares that the retail distribution, sales, and rental of agricultural, construction, utility, industrial, mining, outdoor power, forestry, and lawn and garden equipment, utilizing independent dealers operating under contract with the supplier vitally affects the general economy of the state, the public interest, and the public welfare. Therefore, the Legislature has determined that it is necessary to regulate the business relations between the dealers and suppliers as described in this chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2005, Ch. 712, Sec. 2.   Effective October 7, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

22901.

The following definitions apply for purposes of this chapter:

(a) “Act” means the Fair Practices of Equipment Manufacturers, Distributors, Wholesalers, and Dealers Act.

(b) “Bulk sales law” means the Uniform Commercial Code-Bulk Sales as contained in Division 6 (commencing with Section 6101) of the Commercial Code.

(c) “Claim” means a dealer’s claim for reimbursement from a supplier for labor and materials expended by the dealer to meet the requirements of the supplier’s warranty agreement with a consumer of the supplier’s products if the dealer has complied with the supplier’s then-existing written policies and procedures for warranties and warranty claims.

(d) “Current parts price” means, with respect to current parts, the price for repair parts listed in the supplier’s price list or catalog in effect at the time the dealer contract is canceled or discontinued or, for purposes of Section 22905, the price list or catalog in effect at the time the repair parts were ordered. “Current parts price” also means, with respect to superseded repair parts, the price listed in the supplier’s price list or catalog in effect at the time the dealer contract is canceled or discontinued for the part that performs the same function and purpose as the superseded part, but is simply listed under a different part number.

(e) “Current net parts cost” means the current parts price less any trade or cash discounts typically given to the dealer with respect to that dealer’s normal, ordinary course of orders of repair parts. “Current net parts cost” also means, with respect to a warranty, the current parts price of the supplier for the equipment repaired less any trade or cash discounts typically given to the dealer with respect to that dealer’s normal, ordinary course of orders of repair parts.

(f) “Dealer” means any person primarily engaged in the retail sale of equipment as defined in subdivision (j). For the purposes of this act, “dealer” does not include a “franchisee” as defined in Section 331.1 of the Vehicle Code or a “new motor vehicle dealer” as defined in Section 426 of the Vehicle Code.

(g) “Dealer contract” means either an oral or written contract, agreement, or arrangement for a definite or indefinite period between a dealer and a supplier that provides for the rights and obligations of the parties with respect to the purchase or sale of equipment or repair parts.

(h) “Dealership” means the retail sale business engaged in by a dealer under a dealer contract.

(i) “Demonstrator” means equipment in a dealer’s inventory that has not been sold, but has had its usage demonstrated to potential customers, either without charge or pursuant to a short-term rental agreement, with the intent of encouraging the potential customer to purchase the equipment.

(j) (1) “Equipment” means all-terrain vehicles and other machinery, equipment, implements, or attachments used for, or in connection with, any of the following purposes:

(A) Lawn, garden, golf course, landscaping, or grounds maintenance.

(B) Planting, cultivating, irrigating, harvesting, and producing agricultural or forestry products.

(C) Raising, feeding, or tending to, or harvesting products from, livestock and any other activity in connection with those activities.

(D) Industrial, construction, maintenance, mining, or utility activities or applications, including, but not limited to, material handling equipment.

(2) Self-propelled vehicles designed primarily for the transportation of persons or property on a street or highway are specifically excluded from the definition of equipment.

(k) “Family member” means a spouse, parent, sibling, child, son-in-law, daughter-in-law, and lineal descendant, including those by adoption.

(l) “Good cause” means failure by a dealer to comply with the requirements imposed on the dealer by the dealer contract, if those requirements are not different from those requirements imposed on other similarly situated dealers in this state.

(m) “Index” means the United States Department of Labor, Bureau of Labor Statistics purchase price index for construction machinery series identification number pcu333120333120, or any successor index measuring substantially similar information.

(n) “Inventory” means equipment, repair parts, data-processing hardware or software, and specialized service or repair parts.

(o) “Major shareholder” means a shareholder with 51-percent or greater interest in a dealership.

(p) “Manufacturer created incentive program” means a program in which the dealer’s inventory has not been sold but has been used for specialized purposes, including, but not limited to, harvest rental programs, dealer purchase rentals, and short-term rentals. The warranty that is transferred to the consumer upon sale, which shall be disclosed prior to sale, is the manufacturer-provided base warranty, less hours and time used while in a manufacturer created incentive program.

(q) “Net equipment cost” means the price the dealer actually paid to the supplier for equipment, plus (1) freight, at truckload rates in effect as of the effective date of the termination of a dealer contract, if freight was paid by the dealer from the supplier’s location to the dealer’s location and (2) reimbursement for labor incurred in preparing the equipment for retail sale or rental, which labor will be reimbursed at the dealer’s standard labor rate charged by the dealer to its customers for nonwarranty repair work; provided, however, if a supplier has established a reasonable setup time, that labor will be reimbursed at an amount equal to the reasonable setup time in effect as of the date of delivery multiplied by the dealer’s standard labor rate.

(r) “Person” means an individual, corporation, partnership, limited liability company, trust, or any and all other forms of business entities, including any other entity in which a person has a majority interest or of which a person has control, as well as the individual officers, directors, and other persons in active control of the activities of each entity.

(s) “Repair parts” means all parts and products related to the service or repair of equipment, including superseded parts.

(t) “Single-line dealer” means a dealer that has (1) purchased construction, industrial, forestry, and mining equipment from a single supplier constituting 75 percent of the dealer’s new equipment, calculated on the basis of net cost; and (2) a total annual average sales volume in excess of forty million dollars ($40,000,000) for the three calendar years immediately preceding the applicable determination date; provided, however, the sales threshold shall be increased each year by an amount equal to the current sales threshold multiplied by the percentage increase in the index from January 1 of the immediately preceding year to January 1 of the current year.

(u) “Single-line supplier” means the supplier that is selling the single-line dealer construction, industrial, forestry, and mining equipment constituting 75 percent of the dealer’s new equipment.

(v) “Supplier” means any person engaged in the business of manufacturing, assembly, or wholesale distribution of equipment or repair parts. “Supplier” also includes any successor in interest to a supplier, including a purchaser of assets or stock, or a surviving corporation resulting from a merger, liquidation, or reorganization of a supplier.

(w) “Terminate” means to terminate, cancel, fail to renew, or materially change the competitive circumstances of a dealer contract.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2006, Ch. 538, Sec. 32.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

22902.

It shall be a violation of this chapter for a supplier to take any of the following actions:

(a) To coerce or compel any dealer to order or accept delivery of any equipment or parts that the dealer has not voluntarily ordered, except as required by any applicable law or unless the equipment or repair parts are safety features required by the supplier.

(b) To coerce or compel any dealer to enter into any contract, whether written or oral, or amend an existing dealer contract with the supplier, unless the contract or amendment is imposed on all other similarly situated dealers in the state.

(c) To refuse to deliver to any dealer in reasonable quantities and within a reasonable time after receipt of the dealer’s order, equipment covered by the dealer contract specifically advertised or represented by the supplier to be available for immediate delivery or on an agreed-upon delivery date. The failure to deliver the equipment shall not be considered a violation of this act if the failure is due to reasonable restrictions on extension of credit by the supplier to the dealer, any breach of or default under the contract by the dealer, an act of God, work stoppage or delay due to a strike or labor difficulty, a bona fide shortage of materials, freight embargo, or a business decision by the supplier to limit the production volume of the equipment and written notice is provided to the dealer within 30 days of that decision or other cause over which the supplier has no control.

(d) To terminate, cancel, or fail to renew a dealer contract or materially change the competitive circumstances of the dealer contract without good cause.

(e) To require as a condition of renewal or extension of a dealer contract that the dealer complete substantial renovation of the dealer’s place of business or acquire new or additional space to serve as the dealer’s place of business, unless the supplier provides at least one year’s written notice of the condition that states all grounds supporting the condition. The supplier shall provide not less than two years for the dealer to complete the renovation or acquisition after the one year’s notice period has expired.

(f) To discriminate, directly or indirectly, in prices charged between different dealers with respect to purchases of equipment or repair parts of like grade and quality and identical brand, where the effect of that discrimination may be to substantially lessen competition, tend to create a monopoly in any line of commerce, or injure, destroy, or prevent competition with any dealer who either grants or knowingly receives the benefit of the discrimination. However, different prices may be charged if (1) the differences are due to differences in the cost of manufacture, sale or delivery of the equipment or repair parts, or (2) the supplier can show that its lower price was made in good faith to meet an equally low price of a competitor and the lower price was made available to other dealers, or (3) the differences are related to the volume of equipment purchased by dealers if the supplier offers all other similarly situated dealers the same volume program.

(g) To prevent, by contract or otherwise, any dealer from changing its capital structure, ownership, or the means by which the dealership is financed, provided the dealer at all times meets any reasonable capital standards imposed by the supplier or as otherwise agreed to between the dealer and the supplier and imposed on similarly situated dealers, and provided this change by the dealer does not result in a change of the controlling interest in the executive management or board of directors, or any guarantors of the dealership.

(h) To prevent, by contract or otherwise, any dealer or any officer, member, partner, or stockholder of any dealer from selling or transferring any part of the interest of any of them to any other party or parties. However, no dealer, officer, partner, member, or stockholder shall have the right to sell, transfer, or assign the dealership or power of management or control of the dealership without the written consent of the supplier.

(i) To require a dealer to assent to a release, assignment, novation, waiver, or estoppel that would relieve any person from liability imposed by this section.

(j) To require any dealer to purchase goods or services as a condition of the sale by the supplier to the dealer of any equipment, repair parts, or other goods or services; except that nothing in this subdivision shall prohibit a supplier from requiring the dealer to purchase repair parts, special tools, and training reasonably necessary to maintain the safe operation or quality of operation in the field of any equipment offered for sale by the dealer.

(k) To coerce any dealer into a refusal to purchase equipment manufactured by another supplier.

(l) To penalize any dealer that purchases equipment or repair parts for sale manufactured by another supplier.

(m) To discriminate, directly or indirectly, between dealers of the same product line in filling an order placed by a dealer for retail sale or lease of equipment under a dealer contract.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2005, Ch. 712, Sec. 4.   Effective October 7, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

22902.5.

Nothing in this chapter permits the offering or enforcement of a provision in a dealer contract that requires a dealer to comply with a minimum price-fixing provision or any other provision to limit competition. For purposes of this chapter, a provision in a dealer contract providing for exclusive territorial rights and its corresponding provisions shall not be prohibited.

(History: Added by Stats. 2005, Ch. 712, Sec. 5.   Effective October 7, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

22903.

(a) This section shall only apply to a dealer contract between a dealer who is not a single-line dealer and a supplier who is not a single-line supplier.

(b) Except where there are grounds for termination of a dealer contract pursuant to paragraph (1), (2), (3), (4), (5), (6), (7), or (8) of subdivision (c), a supplier shall give a dealer 180 days written notice of the supplier’s intent to terminate a dealer contract. The notice shall include all reasons constituting good cause for the termination and shall provide the dealer with 60 days to cure any claimed deficiency. If the deficiency is cured within 60 days to the satisfaction of the supplier, which shall be determined in good faith, the notice of termination shall be
 void. Except as provided in subdivision (d), a supplier may not terminate a dealer contract based on paragraph (12) of subdivision (c) unless the supplier gives the dealer notice of that action at least one year before the effective date of that action. If the dealer achieves the supplier’s requirements for reasonable standards or performance objectives before the expiration of the one-year notice period, the notice shall be void and the dealer contract shall continue in full force and effect.

(c) No supplier, directly or through an officer, agent, or employee, may terminate, cancel, fail to renew, or materially change the competitive circumstances of a dealer contract without good cause. In addition to the definition in subdivision (l) of Section 22901, good cause exists whenever the dealer has taken any of the following actions:

(1) Transferred a controlling ownership interest
 in the dealership without the consent of the supplier, who shall not withhold consent unreasonably.

(2) Made a material misrepresentation or falsification of any record.

(3) Filed a voluntary petition in bankruptcy or has had an involuntary petition in bankruptcy filed against the dealer that has not been dismissed within 60 days after the filing or is insolvent or in receivership.

(4) Pleaded guilty to or has been convicted of a felony involving an act of moral turpitude.

(5) Failed to operate in the normal course of business for seven consecutive business days, without the consent of the supplier, or has terminated the business.

(6) Relocated or established a new or additional dealer’s
 place of business without the supplier’s consent.

(7) Materially defaulted under any chattel mortgage or other security agreement between the dealer and the supplier, or there has been a revocation of any guarantee of the dealer’s present or future obligations to the supplier. However, good cause does not exist if a person revokes any guarantee in connection with or following the transfer of that person’s entire ownership interest in the dealer unless the supplier requires that person to execute a new guarantee of the dealer’s present or future obligations in connection with that transfer of ownership interest.

(8) Failed to satisfy any payment obligation as it became due and payable to the supplier, failed to promptly account to the supplier for any proceeds from the sale of equipment, or failed to hold those proceeds in trust for the benefit of the supplier.

(9) Engaged in conduct that is injurious or detrimental to any of the following:

(A) The dealer’s customers. This includes, but is not limited to, the following conduct: excessive pricing, misleading advertising, failure to provide service and replacement parts, and failure to perform warranty obligations.

(B) The public welfare.

(C) The representation or reputation of the supplier’s product.

(10) Consistently failed to meet building and housekeeping requirements, or failed to provide adequate sales, service, or parts personnel commensurate with the dealer contract.

(11) Consistently failed to comply with the applicable
 licensing laws pertaining to the products and services being represented for and on the supplier’s behalf.

(12) Consistently failed to meet and maintain the supplier’s requirements for reasonable standards and performance objectives, if the supplier has given the dealer reasonable standards and performance objectives that are based on the manufacturer’s experience in other comparable market areas.

(d) Notwithstanding subdivision (c), if the sales, service, rental, and repair of a supplier’s product represents the lesser of 10 percent or three hundred fifty thousand dollars ($350,000) of the dealer’s total gross annual revenue that includes, but is not limited to, the sales, service, rental, or repair, for each dealer location, the supplier may terminate a dealer contract based on paragraph (12) of subdivision (c) upon providing the dealer with notice of that action at least 180
 days before the effective date of that action. If the dealer achieves the supplier’s requirements for reasonable standards or performance objectives within 60 days of receipt of the termination notice, the notice shall be void and the dealer contract shall continue in full force and effect.

(e) Notwithstanding a dealer contract that provides for exclusivity during the term of the contract, a supplier may begin contract negotiations with a potential replacement dealer 60 days prior to the expiration of the notice period that has been provided pursuant to subdivisions (b) or (d) if the dealer failed to achieve the supplier’s requirements for reasonable standards or performance objectives within 60 days of receipt of the termination notice. Nothing in this subdivision shall authorize a replacement dealer to conduct operations with a supplier during the term of a dealer contract.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2009, Ch. 500, Sec. 8.   (AB 1059)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

22903.1.

(a) This section shall only apply to a dealer contract between a dealer who is not a single-line dealer and a supplier who is not a single-line supplier.

(b) If a supplier has contractual authority to approve or deny a request for a sale or transfer of a dealer’s business or an equity ownership interest in the business, the supplier shall approve or deny the request within 60 days after receiving a written request from the dealer. If the supplier has neither approved nor denied the request within the 60-day period, the request shall be deemed approved. The dealer’s request shall include reasonable financial information, personal background, character references, and work history information for the acquiring persons. If a supplier denies a request made pursuant to this section, the supplier shall provide the dealer with a written notice of that denial that states the reasons for the denial. A supplier may only deny a request based on the failure of the proposed transferees to meet the reasonable requirements consistently imposed by the supplier in determining approval of transfers or approvals of new dealers.

(c) If a dealer dies and the supplier has contractual authority to approve or deny a request for the sale or transfer of the dealer’s business or an equity ownership interest in the business, the dealer’s estate or other person with authority to transfer the dealer’s assets shall have 180 days to submit to the supplier a written request for a sale or transfer of that business or equity ownership interest. If the request is timely submitted, the supplier shall approve or deny that request in accordance with subdivision (b). Notwithstanding any contrary provision of this chapter, any attempt by a supplier to terminate the dealer contract as a result of the death of a dealer shall be delayed until there has been compliance with the terms of this section or the 180-day period has expired, as applicable.

(d) Notwithstanding subdivision (c), if a supplier and dealer executed an agreement concerning succession rights prior to the dealer’s death, and if the agreement is still in effect, the agreement shall be observed even if it designated someone other than the surviving spouse or heirs of the decedent as the successor.

(e) A supplier may withhold consent to a transfer of an interest in a dealership if, with due regard to regional market conditions and distribution economies, the dealer’s area of responsibility or trade area does not afford sufficient sales potential to reasonably support a dealer. In any dispute between a supplier and dealer under this subdivision, the supplier shall bear the burden of proving that the dealer’s area of responsibility or trade area does not afford sufficient sales potential to reasonably support a dealer.

(History: Added by Stats. 2005, Ch. 712, Sec. 7.   Effective October 7, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

22903.2.

(a) This section shall only apply to dealer contracts between a single-line dealer and its single-line supplier.

(b) No supplier may terminate a dealer contract without good cause. In addition to the definition in subdivision (l) of Section 22901, good cause exists whenever any one of the following is applicable:

(1) There has been a closeout or sale of 65 percent or more of the dealer’s assets related to the equipment business or there has been a commencement of a dissolution or liquidation of the dealer.

(2) The dealer has changed its principal place of business or added additional locations without prior approval of the supplier, which shall not be unreasonably withheld.
